Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-359
Law enforcement agency, defined.

Law enforcement agency shall mean the police department or the town marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in unincorporated areas, and the Nebraska State Patrol.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 12.